Idaho, session 2025, H0156.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 20-1002, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
20-1002. COMMISSION CREATED -- APPOINTMENT -- QUALIFICATIONS -- TERMS
-- MEETINGS -- COMPENSATION -- EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND STAFF. (1) There is
hereby created the Idaho commission of pardons and parole. The governor
shall appoint seven (7) commissioners, subject to the advice and consent of
the senate.
(2) Commissioners shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and not
more than four (4) commissioners shall be from any one (1) political party.
(3) Terms on the commission shall be for three (3) years, and vacancies
in the commission for unexpired terms shall be filled by appointment by the
governor for the remainder of the term. Commissioners may be reappointed for
subsequent terms.
(4) The commission and the board may meet as necessary to exchange such
information to enable each to effectively carry out their respective duties.
(5) The commission shall meet at such times and places as determined to
be necessary and convenient, or at the call of the executive director, and in
any event no less than quarterly.
(6) Two (2) commissioners may meet to make decisions on the disposition
of parole violations. Such decisions must be unanimous, and in the event
they are not unanimous, then the parole violation disposition decision will
be made by a majority of the full commission either at the next quarterly
meeting or special meeting.
(7) Three (3) commissioners may meet to make decisions to grant or deny
parole. Such decisions must be unanimous, and in the event they are not unan-
imous, then the decision to grant or deny parole will be made by a majority of
the full commission at the next quarterly meeting.
(8) Commissioners shall be compensated as provided by section
59-509(i), Idaho Code, when attending quarterly meetings conducted at a
date and time separate from a hearing session or other meetings approved by
the executive director. Commissioners shall receive compensation of three
hundred dollars ($300) four hundred dollars ($400) per commissioner per day
when conducting parole, commutation, pardon, revocation or other hearings
and shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses subject to the
limitations provided in section 67-2008, Idaho Code.


(9) The governor shall appoint the executive director for the commis-
sion. The executive director shall be the full-time employee who shall re-
port to, serve at the pleasure of, and be compensated as determined by the
governor. The executive director shall be the official representative for
the commission, shall be responsible for the managing and administration of
daily commission business, shall assist the commission in carrying out all
of its duties and powers as prescribed by law, and shall schedule business
meetings and hearing sessions at times convenient to the commissioners. For
each scheduled session, the executive director shall designate one (1) of
the commissioners as the presiding officer for conducting the hearings. The
executive director may hire such staff and employees as are approved by the
governor. The executive director shall also have such other duties and re-
sponsibilities as the governor shall assign.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.